Vermont statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Article 2. Divorce on Ground of Mental Incapacity

§ 631.
Generally.

A divorce may be granted forthwith when either spouse has become permanently incapacitated due to a mental condition or psychiatric disability. A divorce shall not be granted under these provisions unless such person who is permanently incapacitated due to a mental condition or psychiatric disability shall have been duly and regularly confined in a psychiatric hospital, wherever located, for at least five years next preceding the commencement of the action for divorce, nor unless it shall appear to the court that such mental condition or psychiatric disability is permanent. No action shall be maintained under the provisions hereof unless the libelant is an actual resident of this State and shall have resided therein for two years next preceding the commencement of such action.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 70.

§ 632.
Jurisdiction; guardian ad litem for libelee with a mental incapacity.

The Superior Courts of the several counties of this State shall have jurisdiction of such an action. Upon the filing by the plaintiff of a complaint, duly verified, showing that such cause of action exists, a Superior judge shall appoint some person to act as guardian ad litem of such person with a mental incapacity in such action. The complaint and summons in such action shall be served upon the defendant by delivering a copy thereof to such guardian and another to the State’s Attorney of the county in which such action is brought.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 70.

§ 633.
Duty of State’s Attorney.

The State’s Attorney upon whom the complaint and summons in such action shall be served shall appear for such defendant and defend the same.
No divorce shall be granted unless the provisions of this section have been complied with.

§ 634.
Alimony; distribution of property; care and custody of children.

In actions brought for the cause of mental incapacity, the courts and the judges thereof shall possess all the powers relative to the payment of alimony, the distribution of property, and the care and custody of the children of the parties, that such courts now have, or may hereafter have, in other actions for divorce.

The court may make such orders for the division of property held by the parties as tenants by the entirety as may be proper.

No order shall be made providing for continued support of a spouse without a mental condition or psychiatric disability from the estate of a spouse with a mental condition or psychiatric disability after the remarriage of the spouse who does not have a mental condition or a psychiatric disability.

HISTORY:

Amended

1987, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 70.

§ 635.
Support of defendant.

At the time of granting a divorce on the grounds of a permanent mental condition or psychiatric disability or any time thereafter, on motion of either party, or of the guardian of the spouse with a mental condition or psychiatric disability, or of any other person, town, or municipality charged with the support of the spouse with a mental condition or psychiatric disability, the court may make such orders requiring support of the defendant or security for such support as may be proper.

An order for the support of the party with a mental condition or psychiatric disability shall be enforceable in the same manner as orders relating to alimony.

On motion of either party or of the guardian of the spouse with a mental condition or psychiatric disability, or of any person, town, or municipality charged with the support of such defendant, an order relating to such support may be reviewed and altered at any time thereafter in such manner as to the court may seem just and proper.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 70.

§ 636.
Filing certified copies of orders with court which committed party with a mental condition or psychiatric disability.

If the party with a mental condition or psychiatric disability was committed by a court of competent jurisdiction, the clerk of the court shall file a certified copy of all orders entered in proceedings brought under these provisions.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 70.

§ 637.
Costs and expenses.

All the costs in such action, as well as the actual expenses of the state’s attorney therein, together with the expenses and fees of the guardian therein, shall be paid by the plaintiff.
Such expenses of the state’s attorney and expenses and fees of the guardian shall be fixed and allowed by the court.
The court or the judge thereof may make such order relative to the payment of such fees and expenses as to the court or judge may seem proper.